Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 6

Accidents Involving Hazardous Materials

58-2-601. Report to the Tennessee emergency management agency of accidents involving hazardous materials.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, in addition to any reports required by law, any person who is transporting hazardous materials and placarded as carrying such materials as required by regulations of the department of safety and/or department of transportation shall report any accident or incident in which such materials are released from the container in which such materials are being transported to the Tennessee emergency management agency as soon as practicable after such accident or incident. Any other person having knowledge of such accident or incident shall also report such accident or incident to the Tennessee emergency management agency.

Acts 1979, ch. 188, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-6-301; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 117; T.C.A., § 58-2-301; Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, (Acts 1987, ch. 155, §§ 1-9; 1988, ch. 499, § 1; Acts 1998, ch. 1053, § 1), concerning local government emergency assistance, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

58-2-602. Notification of community officials.

As soon as practicable after receiving any such accident or incident report, such agency shall notify the appropriate officials in the community in which such accident or incident occurred.

Acts 1979, ch. 188, § 2; T.C.A., § 7-6-302; § 58-2-302; Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, (Acts 1987, ch. 155, §§ 1-9; 1988, ch. 499, § 1; Acts 1998, ch. 1053, § 1), concerning local government emergency assistance, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

58-2-603. Records and reports of accidents maintained.

The Tennessee emergency management agency shall maintain records of all such accident or incident reports, together with reports from other agencies of state and local governments which respond to such accident or incident.

Acts 1987, ch. 155, § 3; T.C.A., § 58-2-303; 2000, ch. 946, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, (Acts 1987, ch. 155, §§ 1-9; 1988, ch. 499, § 1; Acts 1998, ch. 1053, § 1), concerning local government emergency assistance, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

58-2-604. Removal or abatement of hazardous substances discharge.

The county legislative body or the county emergency management agency (or other body authorized by the county legislative body) is authorized to take such steps as necessary to remove or abate any discharge of hazardous substances associated with a transportation incident or an emergency spill within the county, or to contract with a private entity for removal of the same; and, further, have the authority to recover costs from any person or persons responsible for causing a discharge of hazardous substances that requires emergency action. This section does not apply to a person, as defined in § 68-212-104, or a liable party, as defined in § 68-212-202, operating under a permit or an order issued by the department of environment and conservation.

For the purposes of this section:

“Costs” means those necessary and reasonable costs incurred by the county legislative body or emergency management agency or its authorized agents in connection with removing or abating hazardous substance discharges; provided, that to the extent criteria and methods for response actions prescribed under 40 CFR 300, as amended, may be applied to the type of material involved and the conditions of the spill, release or discharge, such costs shall only apply if those criteria were employed in the county's response;

“Costs” also includes reasonable attorney's fees if the county legislative body, the county emergency management agency, or other body authorized by the county legislative body prevails in an action to recover its expenses from any person or persons responsible for causing a discharge of hazardous substances that requires emergency action; and

“Hazardous substance” means any substance as defined in § 68-131-102.

Acts 1992, ch. 950, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 58-2-304; Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, (Acts 1987, ch. 155, §§ 1-9; 1988, ch. 499, § 1; Acts 1998, ch. 1053, § 1), concerning local government emergency assistance, was repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 946, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.